Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1713
Buy-back or secured investment, defined.

Buy-back or secured investment shall mean any representation which implies in any manner that the purchaser's initial payment is protected from loss.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 13.